District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.06a

Disconnection of service in extreme temperature prohibited.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “forecast of extreme temperature” means a National Weather Service forecast for the District of Columbia of 32 degrees Fahrenheit or below during any time of a day.

(b)

A gas company shall not disconnect residential gas service during the day preceding and the day of a forecast of extreme temperature or if the forecast of extreme temperature precedes a holiday or weekend day, on any day during the holiday or weekend.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 7a
as added Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-82, § 3, 63 DCR 772
Disconnection of natural gas service in extreme temperature prohibited, §  34-1506.01.